Wisconsin, session 2025, AB683.
do enact as follows:AB683,11Section 1. 196.95 of the statutes is created to read:AB683,2,32196.95 Critical telecommunications infrastructure requirements. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:AB683,2,84(a) “Critical telecommunications infrastructure” means physical 5telecommunications infrastructure and equipment that supports the transmission 6of information, regardless of the transmission medium or technology employed, and 7that connects to a telecommunications network that permits the user to engage in 8the use of telecommunications service.AB683,3,21(b) “Entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, 2association, or other organization or enterprise.AB683,3,43(c) “Foreign adversary” means a person determined to be a foreign adversary 4under 15 CFR 791.4.AB683,3,55(d) “Foreign principal” means any of the following:AB683,3,661. The government or an official of the government of a foreign adversary.AB683,3,1072. An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, is not a lawful 8permanent resident of the United States, and does not hold a valid, unexpired visa 9issued by the federal department of state that authorizes the individual to be 10legally present in this state.AB683,3,12113. A business entity that is organized under the laws of a foreign adversary 12that does not have its principal place of business in the United States.AB683,3,14134. An investment fund that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary or 14agent of a foreign adversary.AB683,3,17155. An entity that has 50 percent or more of its stock, securities, or other 16indicia of ownership owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by a person or 17combination of persons described in subds. 1. to 4.AB683,3,18186. An agent of a person described in subds. 1. to 5.AB683,3,2019(e) “Telecommunications service” has the meaning given in s. 182.017 (1g) 20(cq).AB683,4,321(2) Equipment manufactured by foreign principal prohibited. Except as 22provided in sub. (3), beginning on the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB 23inserts date], no provider of telecommunications service may purchase, rent, lease, 24obtain, or maintain critical telecommunications infrastructure that includes 1equipment manufactured by a foreign principal or equipment that is prohibited by 2the federal government on the list published by the federal communications 3commission under 47 USC 1601.AB683,4,114(3) Removal of existing equipment. A provider of telecommunications 5service who, on the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], 6maintains critical telecommunications infrastructure that includes equipment 7manufactured by a foreign principal or equipment that is prohibited by the federal 8government on the list published by the federal communications commission under 947 USC 1601 shall remove that equipment from the critical telecommunications 10infrastructure in accordance with the federal program established under 47 USC 111601 et seq.AB683,4,1512(4) Certification; reporting prohibited equipment. (a) Annually, no 13later than January 15, each provider of telecommunications service shall certify to 14the commission whether the provider is in compliance with the requirements in 15subs. (2) and (3).AB683,4,2016(b) Except as provided in sub. (3), a provider of telecommunications service 17who maintains critical telecommunications infrastructure that includes equipment 18manufactured by a foreign principal or equipment that is prohibited by the federal 19government on the list published by the federal communications commission under 2047 USC 1601 shall provide to the public service commission all of the following:AB683,4,21211. The geographic coordinates of the equipmentAB683,4,22222. The telecommunications service coverage area serviced by the equipment.AB683,4,24233. A plan for replacing the equipment in accordance with the federal program 24established under 47 USC 1601 et seq.AB683,5,41(c) 1. The commission shall use the information provided under par. (b) to 2produce a map of this state showing the locations of the equipment described in par. 3(b) and the telecommunications service coverage areas described in par. (b) and 4shall make the map available to the public.AB683,5,852. Annually, no later than February 15, the commission shall prepare a 6written report containing the map described in subd. 1. and submit the report to 7the governor and to the speaker of the assembly, the president of the senate, and the 8appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3).AB683,5,99